Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 8

Lawsuits by Inmates

41-21-801. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Claim” means any lawsuit or appeal filed by an inmate except a petition for post-conviction relief;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of correction;

“Department” means the department of correction;

“Inmate” means a person housed in a facility operated by the department, housed in a county jail or housed in a correctional facility operated by a private corporation pursuant to a contract with the state or local government; and

“Trust account” means an inmate's trust account administered by the department or by a county jail.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1; 2001, ch. 76, § 1.

41-21-802. Applicability.

This part applies only to a claim brought by an inmate in general sessions or a trial level court of record in which an affidavit of inability to pay costs is filed with the claim by the inmate.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-803. Venue.

Except as otherwise provided by law, an action that accrued while the plaintiff inmate was housed in a facility operated by the department or in a facility operated by a private corporation pursuant to a contract with the state or local government shall be brought in the county in which the facility is located.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1; 2015, ch. 143, § 1.

Compiler's Note. Acts 2015, ch. 143, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions accruing on or after July 1, 2015.

Cross-References. Venue, title 20, ch. 4.

Law Reviews.

Jurisdiction, Venue and “Localized Actions” in Tennessee (June F. Entman), 39 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2003).

41-21-804. Dismissal of claim — Grounds — Factors for determination — Poverty hearings.

A court may dismiss a claim filed by an inmate, either before or after service of process on the defendant, if the court finds that:

The allegation of poverty in the inmate's affidavit is false; or

The claim is frivolous or malicious.

In determining whether a claim is frivolous or malicious under subsection (a), the court may consider whether or not:

The claim has a chance of success;

The claim has a basis in law and in fact; and

The claim is substantially similar to a previous claim filed by the inmate in that the present claim arises from the same operative facts.

The court may hold a hearing to determine whether the allegation of poverty filed with the claim is false or whether the claim is frivolous or malicious. This hearing may be held before or after service of process on the defendant and may be held on motion of the court, a party to the claim or by any officer of the court.

On the filing of a motion described under subsection (c), the court shall suspend all discovery relating to the claim pending the outcome of the hearing.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-805. Affidavit of inability to pay — Requirements.

Any inmate who files a claim with an affidavit of inability to pay costs shall file a separate affidavit with the following information:

A complete list of every lawsuit or claim previously filed by the inmate, without regard to whether the inmate was incarcerated at the time any claim or action was filed; and

For each claim or action listed in subsection (a):

The operative facts for which relief was sought;

The case name, case number and court in which the suit or claim was filed;

The legal theory on which the relief sought was based;

The identification of each party named in the action; and

The final result of the action, including dismissal as frivolous or malicious under this part or otherwise.

If the affidavit filed under this section states that a previous suit was dismissed as frivolous or malicious, the affidavit must state the date of the final order affirming the dismissal.

The affidavit must be accompanied by a current certified copy of the inmate's trust account statement.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-806. Claims subject to review by grievance committees.

An inmate who files a claim that is subject to review by the grievance committee established by the department shall file with the court an affidavit stating the date that the grievance was filed and the date the final decision was received by the inmate with a copy of the final decision from the grievance committee.

The court shall dismiss the claim if the inmate fails to file the claim before the thirty-first day after the date the inmate receives the final decision from the grievance committee.

If a claim is filed before the grievance procedure is complete, the court shall stay the proceeding with respect to the claim for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days to permit completion of the grievance procedure.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-807. Accounting of inmate funds required as part of civil action — Payment of fees — Frivolous or malicious claims.

An inmate seeking to bring a civil action or appeal a judgment in a civil action or proceeding without prepayment of fees or security for the fees, in addition to filing the affidavit required by § 41-21-805, shall submit a certified copy of the trust fund account statement, or the institutional equivalent, for the inmate for the six-month period immediately preceding the filing of the complaint or notice of appeal, obtained from the appropriate official of each facility at which the inmate is or was confined.

If an inmate brings a civil action or files an appeal in forma pauperis, the inmate shall be required to pay the full amount of the filing fee. The court shall assess and, when funds exist, collect, as a partial payment of any court fees required by law, an initial partial filing fee of twenty percent (20%) of the greater of the average monthly:

Deposits to the inmate's account; or

Balance in the inmate's account for the six-month period immediately preceding the filing of the complaint or notice of appeal.

After payment of the initial partial filing fee, the inmate shall be required to make monthly payments of twenty percent (20%) of the preceding month's income credited to the inmate's account. The agency having custody of the inmate shall forward payments from the inmate's account to the clerk of the court each time the amount in the account exceeds ten dollars ($10.00) until the filing fees are paid.

In no event shall the filing fee collected exceed the amount of fees permitted by statute for the commencement of a civil action or an appeal of a civil action or criminal judgment.

In no event shall an inmate be prohibited from bringing a civil action or appealing a civil or criminal judgment for the reason that the inmate has no assets and no means by which to pay the initial partial filing fee.

In no event shall an inmate bring a civil action or appeal a judgment in a civil action or proceeding under this section if the inmate has, on three (3) or more prior occasions, while incarcerated or detained in any facility, brought an action or appeal in a court of this state or the United States that was dismissed on the grounds that it was frivolous, malicious or failed to state a claim upon which relief may be granted, unless the inmate is under imminent danger of serious physical injury.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1; 2001, ch. 76, § 2.

Cross-References. Earnings of inmates deposited in trust accounts, establishment and payment of daily room and board rate, § 41-21-511.

41-21-808. Award of costs — Requirement of payment of costs — Withdrawal from inmate's trust account — Separate from other methods of collection — Additional payments.

Judgment may be rendered for costs at the conclusion of the suit, action, claim or appeal as in other proceedings. If the judgment against the inmate includes the payment of costs, the inmate shall be required to pay the full amount of costs ordered.

The clerk of the court shall mail a copy of the court's judgment taxing costs against the inmate to the department or county jail, as appropriate. On receipt of a copy of the judgment, the department or county jail shall withdraw funds from the inmate's trust account in the amounts provided by § 41-21-807(b) for the collection of filing fees and shall forward the collected funds to the clerk of the court until the costs are paid in full or the inmate is released from confinement.

This section establishes an additional method for collecting costs separate from an execution or garnishment under title 26. The provisions of title 26, chapter 2 relative to exemptions and garnishments shall not apply to collections made pursuant to this section. In addition to collecting costs under this section, the clerk of the court may pursue any other means of collection provided for by law.

An inmate may authorize payments to the clerk of the court in addition to those payments authorized by this section.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1; 2001, ch. 76, § 3; 2002, ch. 607, § 1.

Cross-References. Earnings of inmates deposited in trust accounts, establishment and payment of daily room and board rate, § 41-21-511.

41-21-809. Hearings — Video communications.

The court may hold a hearing under this part at a county jail or a facility operated by the department or may conduct the hearing with video communications technology that permits the court to see and hear the inmate and that permits the inmate to see and hear the court and any other witnesses.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-810. Request for documents — Affidavits to be under oath.

The court may request a person with an admissible document or admissible testimony relevant to the subject matter of the hearing to submit a copy of the document or an affidavit stating the substance of the testimony. An affidavit submitted under this section must be made under oath. A person submitting an affidavit or document under this section is not required to appear at the hearing.

A copy of a document submitted under this section must be accompanied by a certification executed under oath by an appropriate custodian of the record stating that the copy is correct and any other matter relating to the admissibility of the document that the court may require.

The court shall provide the inmate a copy of each affidavit or document not later than twenty-four (24) hours before the time at which the hearing is to begin.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-811. Dismissal of claim or portion of claim.

The court may enter an order dismissing the entire claim or a portion of the claim. If a portion of the claim is dismissed, the court shall designate the issues and defendants on which the claim may proceed, subject to the provisions of §§ 41-21-807 and 41-21-808.

An order under this section is not subject to an interlocutory appeal by the inmate.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-812. Filing of subsequent lawsuits not permitted until expenses paid — Injunctive relief.

Except as provided by subsection (b), on notice of assessment of any fees, taxes, costs and expenses under this part, a clerk of a court may not accept for filing another claim by the same inmate until prior fees, taxes, costs and other expenses are paid in full.

A court may allow an inmate who has not paid any costs or expenses assessed against the inmate to file a claim for injunctive relief seeking to enjoin an act or failure to act that creates a substantial threat of irreparable injury or serious physical harm to the inmate.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-813. Inmate questionnaires.

In order to implement this part, a court may develop for its use a questionnaire to be completed and filed by the inmate.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-814. Part not modifiable or repealable by supreme court.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, this part may not be modified or repealed by any rule promulgated or adopted by the supreme court.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-815. Claims for preventive relief.

This part does not authorize a claim for preventive relief against the department, an employee of the department or of any other agency, agent, employee or officer of this state if the claim is brought by a person housed in a facility operated by the department and the claim accrued while the person was housed in the facility.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-816. Forfeit of good conduct credits.

The commissioner shall forfeit an inmate's good conduct sentence reduction credits in the amount specified by subsection (b) on:

Receipt by the department of a certified copy of a final order of a state or federal court that dismisses as frivolous or malicious a claim or lawsuit filed by an inmate while the inmate was in the custody of the department; and

A determination that the department has, on one (1) or more occasions, received a certified copy of a final order of a state or federal court dismissing as frivolous or malicious a claim or lawsuit filed previously by the inmate while the inmate was in the custody of the department.

On receipt of a final order described by subdivision (a)(1), the commissioner shall forfeit:

Sixty (60) days of an inmate's accrued good conduct sentence reduction credits if the department has previously received one (1) final order described by subdivision (a)(2);

One hundred twenty (120) days of an inmate's accrued good conduct sentence reduction credits if the department has previously received two (2) final orders described by subdivision (a)(2); or

One hundred eighty (180) days of an inmate's accrued good conduct sentence reduction credits if the department has previously received three (3) final orders described by subdivision (a)(2).

The commissioner may not restore good conduct sentence reduction credits forfeited under this section for any reason.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-817. Grievance resolution system.

The department shall develop and maintain a system for the resolution of grievances by inmates housed in facilities operated by the department that qualifies for certification under 42 U.S.C. § 1997e, and the department shall obtain certification under that section. A remedy provided by the grievance system is the exclusive administrative remedy available to an inmate for a claim for relief that arises while the inmate is housed in a facility operated by the department, other than a remedy provided by writ of habeas corpus challenging the validity of an action occurring before the delivery of the inmate to the department.

The grievance system must provide procedures for an inmate to identify evidence to substantiate the inmate's claim and for an inmate to receive copies of all formal written responses to the inmate's grievance.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 1.

41-21-818. Administrative procedures.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this part. All rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1996, ch. 913, § 2.